Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.130

Taking possession by director—Reasons—Disposition of deposits—Claims—Priorities.

The director may take possession of the office of an alien bank for the reasons stated and in the manner provided in chapter 30A.44 RCW. Upon the director taking such possession of a branch, no deposit liabilities of which are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation, the amounts deposited pursuant to RCW 30A.42.120(1) shall thereupon become the property of the director, free and clear of any and all liens and other claims, and shall be held by the director in trust for the United States domiciled depositors of the office in this state of such alien bank. Upon obtaining the approval of the superior court of Thurston county, the director shall reduce such deposited capital to cash and as soon as practicable distribute it to such depositors.

If sufficient cash is available, such distribution shall be in equal amounts to each such depositor: PROVIDED, That no such depositor receives more than the amount of his or her deposit or an amount equal to the maximum amount insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation, whichever is less. If sufficient cash is not available, such distribution shall be on a pro rata basis to each such depositor: PROVIDED, That no such depositor receives more than the maximum amount insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation. If any cash remains after such distribution, it shall be distributed pro rata to those depositors whose deposits have not been paid in full: PROVIDED, That no depositor receives more than the amount of his deposit. For purposes of this section, the term "depositor" shall not include any other offices, subsidiaries or affiliates of such alien bank.

The term "deposit" as used in this section shall mean the unpaid balance of money or its equivalent received or held by the branch in the usual course of its business and for which it has given or is obligated to give credit, either conditionally or unconditionally to a demand, time or savings account, or which is evidenced by its certificate of deposit, or a check or draft drawn against a deposit account and certified by the branch, or a letter of credit or traveler's checks on which the branch is primarily liable.

Claims of depositors and creditors shall be made and disposed of in the manner provided in chapter 30A.44 RCW in the event of insolvency or inability of the bank to pay its creditors in this state. The capital deposit of the bank shall be available for claims of depositors and creditors. The claims of depositors and creditors shall be paid from the capital deposit in the following order or priority:

(1) Claims of depositors not paid from the amounts deposited pursuant to RCW 30A.42.120(1);

(2) Claims of Washington domiciled creditors;

(3) Other creditors domiciled in the United States; and

(4) Creditors domiciled in foreign countries.

The director shall proceed in accordance with and have all the powers granted by chapter 30A.44 RCW.

[ 2014 c 37 s 218; 1994 c 92 s 90; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 13. Formerly RCW 30.42.130.]